Hawaii statutes.
[Part XIII.] ARSON

Cross References

Special sentencing considerations for arson; other actions
not prohibited, see §706-606.2.

[§708-8251] Arson in the first degree. (1)
A person commits the offense of arson in the first degree if the person intentionally
or knowingly sets fire to or causes to be burned property and:

(a) Knowingly places another person in danger of
death or bodily injury; or

(b) Knowingly or recklessly damages the property of
another, without the other's consent, in an amount exceeding $20,000.

(2) Arson in the first degree is a class A
felony. [L 2006, c 181, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next